Wisconsin, session 2025, AB643.
do enact as follows:AB643,15Section 1. 230.35 (4) (a) 5m. of the statutes is created to read:AB643,2,11230.35 (4) (a) 5m. November 11.AB643,22Section 2. 230.35 (4) (a) 10. of the statutes is amended to read:AB643,2,43230.35 (4) (a) 10. The day following if January 1, July 4, November 11, or 4December 25 falls on Sunday.AB643,35Section 3. 230.35 (4) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB643,2,96230.35 (4) (c) Except as provided in the compensation plan under s. 230.12, all 7employees except limited term employees shall receive 9 10 paid holidays annually 8in addition to any other authorized paid leave, the time to be at the discretion of the 9appointing authorities.AB643,410Section 4. 230.35 (4) (d) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB643,2,1611230.35 (4) (d) (intro.) In addition to the holidays granted under par. (c) and 12except as provided in the compensation plan under s. 230.12, all employees except 13limited term employees shall earn 3.5 paid personal holidays each calendar year, 14plus one additional paid personal holiday each calendar year in recognition of 15Veterans Day. Eligibility to take the personal holidays during the year earned is 16subject to the following:AB643,517Section 5. Effective date.AB643,2,1818(1) This bill takes effect on the January 1 after publication.AB643,2,1919